Utah statutes.
31A-6b-204.   Guaranteed Asset Protection Waiver Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Guaranteed Asset Protection Waiver Restricted Account."

(2)  The restricted account shall consist of the money received by the commissioner under this part.

(3)  The commissioner shall administer the restricted account.  Subject to appropriations by the Legislature, the commissioner shall use the money deposited into the restricted account to pay for a cost or expense incurred by the commissioner in the administration, investigation, and enforcement of this chapter.

